Massachusetts, session 194th, H2424.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 78 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2004
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 1, the words “section seventy-nine to
eighty-eight” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- sections 78A to 88.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 93 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 78, as
so appearing, the following section:-
Section 78A. A health club shall have on the premises at least 1 AED, as defined in
section 12V½ of chapter 112, and shall have in attendance during staffed business hours at least
1 employee or authorized volunteer as an AED provider, as defined in said section 12V½ of said
chapter 112.
of 3

Section 78B. A health club shall have a written emergency response policies and
procedures, which shall be reviewed regularly and rehearsed. The written plan should be publicly
available to all health club members.
Section 78C
The location of each AED shall have the following characteristics: secure and easily
accessible; well marked, publicized, and known among trained staff; and near a communication
line (telephone, radio, etc.) that may be used to contact backup, security, EMS, or 911.
SECTION 3. Section 86 of said chapter 93, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding
the following paragraph:-
Absent a showing of gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, no cause of
action against a health club or its employees may arise in connection with the use or non-use of a
defibrillator.
SECTION 4. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
12V, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 12V. Any person, whose usual and regular duties do not include the provision of
emergency medical care, and who, in good faith, attempts to render emergency care including,
but not limited to, cardiopulmonary resuscitation or defibrillation, and does so without
compensation, shall not be liable for acts or omissions, other than gross negligence or willful or
wanton misconduct, resulting from the attempt to render such emergency care.
SECTION 5. Sections 1 and 2 of this act shall not apply to a health club, as defined by
section 78 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, if that health club employs 5 or fewer full-time
of 3

equivalent employees, until 2 years after the effective date of this act. Sections 1 and 2 of this act
shall not apply to a health club, as so defined by said section 78 of said chapter 93, if that health
club employs more than 5 full-time equivalent employees, until 1 year after the effective date of
this act. For the purposes of this section, the term “full-time equivalent employee” shall equal 40
labor hours per week.
of 3